Maine, session 132, LD101.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §10103, sub-§12, as enacted by PL 2003, c. 414, Pt. A, §2 and
affected by c. 614, §9, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §10103, sub-§13 is enacted to read:
13. Public records retention; fees for public records requests; confidentiality of
e-mail addresses. The following provisions govern the commissioner's duties in respect
to the public records produced and maintained by the department.
A. The commissioner shall comply with any program or guidance established and
administered by the State Archivist pursuant to Title 5, section 95-C, subsection 2 in
respect to management of department records, including guidance requiring the
department to maintain a records retention schedule for all records the department
creates, including, but not limited to, applications, licenses, registrations, permits,
reports, summonses and warnings. The commissioner may collect and maintain other
records and information related to other functions of the department, including the
enforcement of civil violations.
B. The commissioner shall collect and maintain criminal history record information
related to violations of this Part.
C. The commissioner shall provide access to public records maintained by the
department in the same manner as required pursuant to Title 1, section 408-A unless
an exemption established in paragraph D or E applies.
D. Notwithstanding the fees established in Title 1, section 408-A, subsection 8, the
department may charge a fee of $5 per record for providing individual copies of
applications, licenses, registrations, permits and recreational vehicle crash reports
maintained by the department when there is a request made to the department.
E. Notwithstanding the fees established in Title 1, section 408-A, subsection 8, the
department may charge to individuals, businesses and other entities that make a request
to the department a fee of 3 cents per name or per record to provide a spreadsheet or
list of records pertaining to applications, licenses, registrations, permits and
recreational vehicle crash reports, except that requests made under this paragraph are
subject to a minimum fee of $10 regardless of the number of names or records that are
a part of the request.
F. Fees charged pursuant to paragraphs D and E apply to electronic and paper copies
of records, copies of records that are notarized and copies that are not notarized. Fees
charged pursuant to paragraphs D and E are subject to sales tax in accordance with
Title 36, section 1811.
G. The commissioner shall allow an applicant for a hunting or fishing license to
indicate that the applicant's e-mail address is confidential. If a person indicates that the
person's e-mail address submitted as part of the application process for a hunting or
fishing license is confidential as provided in this paragraph, that information is
confidential. E-mail addresses designated as confidential under this paragraph are not
confidential to department personnel or law enforcement officers or for purposes of
court proceedings.
Page 1 - 132LR0250(01)

The department shall adopt rules to establish a fee schedule and procedures governing this
subsection. Rules adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules pursuant
to Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §10110, as enacted by PL 2011, c. 185, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 4. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§11, ¶A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 437, §10, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) A sale in the ordinary course of business by a retailer to a purchaser who is not
engaged in selling that kind of tangible personal property or taxable service in the
ordinary course of repeated and successive transactions of like character; and
Sec. 5. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§11, ¶A, as amended by PL 2007, c. 437, §10, is
further amended by enacting a new subparagraph (3-A) to read:
(3-A) The delivery of records, spreadsheets or lists of records requested pursuant
to Title 12, section 10103, subsection 13, paragraph D or E to a person requesting
those records, spreadsheets or lists in exchange for the fees established pursuant to
Title 12, section 10103, subsection 13, paragraph D or E; and
Sec. 6. 36 MRSA §1752, sub-§14, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 643, Pt. H,
§§14 to 18 and affected by §29 and amended by c. 673, §§14 to 18 and affected by §28, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (11) to read:
(11) Any charge, deposit, fee or premium imposed by a law of this State, except
for the fees established pursuant to Title 12, section 10103, subsection 13,
paragraph D or E;